California, session 20252026, AB1375.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 3040.5 is added to the Family Code, to read:3040.5. When making a determination of the best interests of a child pursuant to Section 3011, the court shall consider any relevant, admissible evidence that a parent has caused human trafficking of the child or other parent.